Oklahoma, session 2025, SB634.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 265, O.S.L.
2024 (47 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 6-212.7), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 6-212.7. A. There is hereby created the Impaired
Driving Prevention Advisory Committee. The Committee shall be
comprised of:
1. The Commissioner of Public Safety, or a designee, who shall
act as the Chair chair;
2. The Chief of the Oklahoma Highway Patrol, or a designee;
3. A member appointed by the District Attorneys Council;
4. A member appointed by the Administrative Office of the
Courts;

5. The Director of the Department Commissioner of Mental Health
and Substance Abuse Services, or a designee;
6. The Director of the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation,
or a designee;
7. The State Director of the Board of Tests for Alcohol and
Drug Influence, or a designee;
8. The Director of the Oklahoma Highway Safety Office, or a
designee;
9. The President of the Oklahoma Association of Chiefs of
Police, or a designee;
10. The President of the Oklahoma Sheriff’s Association, or a
designee;
11. The Chief Executive Officer Director of Service Oklahoma,
or a designee;
12. A member of the Board of Directors of Safety and Advocacy
For Empowerment (SAFE);
13. A representative designated by a victim advocacy group to
be selected by the Commissioner of Public Safety;
14. A member of the Oklahoma House of Representatives appointed
by the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of Representatives; and
15. A member of the Oklahoma State Senate appointed by the
President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate;
16. The State Commissioner of Health, or a designee;
17. The Executive Director of the Department of Transportation,
or a designee;
18. The Executive Director of the Oklahoma Medical Marijuana
Authority, or a designee;
ENR. S. B. NO. 634 Page 2

19. The Executive Director of the State Board of Pharmacy, or a
designee;
20. The Executive Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Laws
Enforcement Commission, or a designee;
21. The Executive Director of the Oklahoma Turnpike Authority,
or a designee; and
22. The Executive Director of the Oklahoma Indigent Defense
System, or a designee.
B. The Department of Public Safety shall provide administrative
support necessary for the Committee to accomplish the goals and
objectives assigned by this section.
C. The Committee shall meet at the direction of the chair, and
shall meet not less than once a year, but not more than four times a
year. A vice chair shall be elected by the Committee from among its
members. The vice chair shall act as chair of the Committee in the
absence of the chair.
D. The Committee is authorized to collect, analyze, and
interpret relevant crash data on impaired driving and associated
traffic crashes. In addition, the Committee is authorized to
review, evaluate, and monitor the impaired driving system of this
state and provide a network of communication and cooperation among
the various stakeholders to coordinate and integrate efforts and
resources to reduce the incidence and severity of impaired driving
crashes.
E. The Committee shall annually complete a statewide strategic
plan to reduce the incidents of impaired driving and impaired
driving crashes. The plan shall be submitted no later than December
31 of each year to the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the
Oklahoma State Senate, and the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of
Representatives.
F. Members of the Committee who are otherwise employed by a
state agency or political subdivision shall serve without additional
compensation. Members of the Committee who are otherwise employed
by a state agency or political subdivision shall be entitled to
ENR. S. B. NO. 634 Page 3

reimbursement for any actual and necessary traveling expenses in
accordance with the State Travel Reimbursement Act from the
employing agency.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 634 Page 4

Passed the Senate the 12th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 30th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 634 Page 5